North Carolina, session 2025, SB779.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Health Benefits, the sum of three hundred nineteen
million dollars ($319,000,000) in recurring funds and associated receipts, beginning with each
year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium. These funds shall be used for projected changes in
Medicaid enrollment, enrollment mix, service and capitation costs, and federal match rates.
SECTION 2. This act is effective retroactively to July 1, 2025.
*S779-v-1*